Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 307.394 is amended to read:
307.394. (1) The following  [ tangible personal ] property is exempt from ad valorem property tax-
ation:
[(a) Farm machinery and equipment  used primarily in the preparation of land, planting, raising,
cultivating, irrigating, harvesting or placing in storage of farm crops; ]
(a) Farm machinery and equipment used or held for use primarily in the preparation of
land or the planting, raising, cultivating, irrigating, harvesting or placing in storage of  farm
crops;
(b) Farm machinery and equipment used or held for use  primarily for the purpose of :
(A) Feeding[ ,] or breeding[ , management and sale of, or the produce of, ] livestock, poultry, fur-
bearing animals or bees ;
(B) The management and sale of livestock, poultry, fur-bearing  animals or bees or their
produce; or
(C) [ for] Dairying and the sale of dairy products;
(c) Machinery and equipment used or held for use  primarily to  implement a remediation plan
as defined in ORS 308A.053 for the period of time for which the remediation plan is certified; or
(d) Farm  machinery and equipment used or held for use  primarily in any other agricultural or
horticultural use or animal husbandry or any combination of these activities.
[(2)(a) Items of tangible personal  property, including but not limited to tools, machinery and
equipment that are used predominantly in the construction,  reconstruction, maintenance, repair, support
or operation of farm machinery, and equipment  and other real or personal farm improvements that are
used primarily in animal husbandry, agricultural or  horticultural activities, or any combination of
these activities, are exempt from ad valorem property taxation. ]
(2)(a) Items of property, including tools and machinery  and equipment that are used or
held for use primarily in the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, repair, support or
operation of farm machinery, and equipment and other real or  personal farm improvements
that are used or held for  use primarily in animal husbandry, agricultural or horticultural
Enrolled House Bill 4111 (HB 4111-A) Page 1
activities, or any combination of these activities, are exempt from  ad valorem property tax-
ation.
(b) An item of [ tangible personal ] property described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is ex-
empt from ad valorem property taxation only if the person that owns, possesses or controls the  item
also:
(A) Owns,  possesses or controls the farm machinery, equipment and other real and personal farm
improvements for which the item is used  or held for use ; and
(B) Carries on  the animal husbandry, agricultural or horticultural activity, or combination of
activities,  in  which the farm machinery, equipment or other real and personal farm improvements
are used  or held for use .
(c) This subsection does not apply to land or buildings.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 307.394 by section 1 of this 2024 Act  apply to
property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4111 (HB 4111-A) Page 2